Nebraska, session 109, LB328.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB328 LB328
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 58-703, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
58-703 The Affordable Housing Trust Fund is created. The fund shall
receive money pursuant to section 76-903 and may include revenue from
sources recommended by the housing advisory committee established in
section 58-704, appropriations from the Legislature, transfers authorized
by the Legislature, grants, private contributions, repayment of loans,
and all other sources. The Department of Economic Development as part of
its comprehensive housing affordability strategy shall administer the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund.
Transfers may be made from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund to the
General Fund, the Behavioral Health Services Fund, the Lead-Based Paint
Hazard Control Cash Fund, the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment
Fund, the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund, and the Site and
Building Development Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Sec. 2. Section 58-711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-711 (1) The Department of Economic Development shall submit, as
part of the department's annual status report under section 81-1201.11,
the following information regarding the Affordable Housing Trust Fund:
(a) The applications funded during the previous calendar year; (b) the
applications funded in previous years; (c) the identity of the
organizations receiving funds; (d) the location of each project; (e) the
amount of funding provided to each project; (f) the amount of funding
leveraged as a result of each project; (g) the number of units of housing
created by each project and the occupancy rate; (h) the expected cost of
rent or monthly payment of those units; (i) the projected number of new
employees and community investment as a result of each project; (j) the
amount of revenue deposited into the Affordable Housing Trust Fund
pursuant to section 76-903; (k) the total amount of funds for which
applications were received during the previous calendar year, the year-
-2-

LB328 LB328
2025 2025
end fund balance, and, if all available funds have not been committed, an
explanation of the reasons why all such funds have not been so committed;
(k) (l) the amount of appropriated funds actually expended by the
department for the previous calendar year; (l) (m) the department's
current budget for administration of the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act
and the department's planned use and distribution of funds, including
details on the amount of funds to be expended on projects and the amount
of funds to be expended by the department for administrative purposes;
and (m) (n) project summaries, including the applicant municipality,
project description, grant amount requested, amount and type of matching
funds, and reasons for approval or denial for every application seeking
funds during the previous calendar year.
(2) The status report shall contain no information that is protected
by state or federal confidentiality laws.
Sec. 3. Section 68-1604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-1604 The Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund is hereby
created. The fund shall include the proceeds raised from the documentary
stamp tax and remitted for such fund pursuant to section 76-903 and
transfers authorized by the Legislature. Money remitted to such fund
shall be used by the department (1) for grants to eligible shelter
providers as set out in section 68-1605 for the purpose of assisting in
the alleviation of homelessness, to provide temporary and permanent
shelters for homeless persons, to encourage the development of projects
which link housing assistance to programs promoting the concept of self-
sufficiency, and to address the needs of the migrant farmworker and (2)
to aid in defraying the expenses of administering the Homeless Shelter
Assistance Trust Fund Act, which shall not exceed seventy-five thousand
dollars in any fiscal year.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
-3-

LB328 LB328
2025 2025
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 4. Section 71-812, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-812 (1) The Behavioral Health Services Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the division and shall contain cash funds
appropriated by the Legislature or otherwise received by the department
for the provision of behavioral health services from any other public or
private source and directed by the Legislature for credit to the fund.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature.
(2) The Behavioral Health Services Fund shall be used to encourage
and facilitate the statewide development and provision of community-based
behavioral health services, including, but not limited to, (a) the
provision of grants, loans, and other assistance for such purpose and (b)
reimbursement to providers of such services.
(3)(a) The Behavioral Health Services Fund Money transferred to the
fund under section 76-903 shall also be used for housing-related
assistance for very low-income adults with serious mental illness, except
that if the division determines that all housing-related assistance
obligations under this subsection have been fully satisfied, the division
may distribute any excess money in the fund, up to twenty percent of such
money, to regional behavioral health authorities for acquisition or
rehabilitation of housing to assist such persons. The division shall
manage and distribute such funds based upon a formula established by the
division, in consultation with regional behavioral health authorities and
the department, in a manner consistent with and reasonably calculated to
promote the purposes of the public behavioral health system enumerated in
section 71-803. The division shall contract with each regional behavioral
health authority for the provision of such assistance. Each regional
behavioral health authority may contract with qualifying public, private,
or nonprofit entities for the provision of such assistance.
-4-

LB328 LB328
2025 2025
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Adult with serious mental illness means a person eighteen years
of age or older who has, or at any time during the immediately preceding
twelve months has had, a diagnosable mental, behavioral, or emotional
disorder of sufficient duration to meet diagnostic criteria identified in
the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders and which has resulted in functional impairment that
substantially interferes with or limits one or more major life functions.
Serious mental illness does not include DSM V codes, substance abuse
disorders, or developmental disabilities unless such conditions exist
concurrently with a diagnosable serious mental illness;
(ii) Housing-related assistance includes rental payments, utility
payments, security and utility deposits, landlord risk mitigation
payments, and other related costs and payments;
(iii) Landlord risk mitigation payment means a payment provided to a
landlord who leases or rents property to a very low-income adult with
serious mental illness which may be used to pay for excessive damage to
the rental property, any lost rent, any legal fees incurred by the
landlord in excess of the security deposit, or any other expenses
incurred by the landlord as a result of leasing or renting the property
to such individual; and
(iv) Very low-income means a household income of fifty percent or
less of the applicable median family income estimate as established by
the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 5. Section 76-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-903 The Tax Commissioner shall design such stamps in such
denominations as in his or her judgment will be the most advantageous to
-5-

LB328 LB328
2025 2025
all persons concerned. When any deed subject to the tax imposed by
section 76-901 is offered for recordation, the register of deeds shall
ascertain and compute the amount of the tax due thereon and shall collect
such amount as a prerequisite to acceptance of the deed for recordation.
If a dispute arises concerning the taxability of the transfer, the
register of deeds shall not record the deed until the disputed tax is
paid. If a disputed tax has been paid, the taxpayer may file for a refund
pursuant to section 76-908. The taxpayer may also seek a declaratory
ruling pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
Department of Revenue. Any From each two dollars and twenty-five cents of
tax collected pursuant to section 76-901 , the register of deeds shall be
retained by the register of deeds and retain fifty cents to be placed in
the county general fund and shall remit the balance to the State
Treasurer who shall credit ninety-five cents of such amount to the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund, twenty-five cents of such amount to the
Site and Building Development Fund, twenty-five cents of such amount to
the Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund, and thirty cents of such
amount to the Behavioral Health Services Fund.
Sec. 6. Section 81-12,146, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,146 (1) The Site and Building Development Fund is created. The
fund shall receive money pursuant to section 76-903 and may include
revenue from transfers by the Legislature, grants, private contributions,
repayment of loans, and all other sources. The Department of Economic
Development, as part of its comprehensive business development strategy,
shall administer the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Site
and Building Development Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer five million
-6-

LB328 LB328
2025 2025
dollars from the General Fund to the Site and Building Development Fund
for fiscal year 2022-23 and five million dollars from the General Fund to
the Site and Building Development Fund for fiscal year 2023-24. Such
money shall be placed in a subaccount of the Site and Building
Development Fund and earmarked for use to fund large shovel-ready
commercial and industrial sites developed under the Municipal Inland Port
Authority Act.
(3)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five
hundred thousand dollars from the Site and Building Development Fund for
fiscal year 2024-25 to the department to enter into one or more contracts
to conduct a comprehensive study or studies to identify and evaluate
large commercial and industrial sites in Nebraska that have the potential
to attract major investment and employment opportunities. The study shall
include consideration of super sites that encompass between five hundred
and one thousand acres and mega sites that encompass more than one
thousand acres. At least one proposed site shall be located west of the
one hundredth meridian in Nebraska. The contracts shall be awarded based
on a competitive selection process as determined by the department. The
studies shall be completed no later than December 15, 2024.
(b) The study shall assess the potential geographic locations; the
infrastructure assets that would be required for each site, including
highway, rail, and air transportation, and utilities such as water,
wastewater treatment, electrical power, and natural gas; the population
within fifty miles of each site and whether such population would be
sufficient to provide an adequate workforce for such site; and the
appropriate level of state investment necessary to position Nebraska as a
nationally or globally competitive location for site selection targeting
various sectors, including, but not limited to, advanced manufacturing,
trade, bioscience, agribusiness, warehousing and supply chain logistics,
technology, aerospace, automotive, clean energy, military support, and
life sciences. Such identified state investment levels may include, but
-7-

LB328 LB328
2025 2025
are not limited to, land acquisition costs and infrastructure
investments. The purpose of the study is to provide strategic insights
that will enable the state to attract major investment and employment
opportunities in order to support the growth of transformational
industries within Nebraska.
(c) The Director of Economic Development shall appoint an advisory
committee comprised of representatives of Nebraska economic development
organizations, equally representing each of Nebraska's three
congressional districts, to assist the department in identifying the
location of potential and preferred super sites and mega sites.
Sec. 7. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 8. Original sections 58-711, 68-1604, 76-903, and 81-12,146,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 58-703 and 71-812,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-